Colorado statutes. TITLE 2 Legislative
PART 13
CAPITAL DEVELOPMENT

2-3-1301. Definitions.

As used in this part 13, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Capital asset" has the same meaning as set forth in section 24-30-1301 (1), C.R.S.

"Capital construction" has the same meaning as set forth in section 24-30-1301 (2), C.R.S.

"Capital renewal" has the same meaning as set forth in section 24-30-1301 (3), C.R.S.

"Controlled maintenance" has the same meaning as set forth in section 24-30-1301 (4), C.R.S., including the limitations specified in section 24-30-1303.9, C.R.S.

"Real property" has the same meaning as set forth in section 24-30-1301 (15), C.R.S.

"State" has the same meaning as set forth in section 24-30-1301 (16), C.R.S.

"State agency" has the same meaning as set forth in section 24-30-1301 (17), C.R.S.

"State institution of higher education" has the same meaning as set forth in section 24-30-1301 (18), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire part added, p. 283, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (HB 14-1387), ch. 378, p. 1818, § 13, effective June 6.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1387, see section 1 of chapter 378, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

2-3-1302. Capital development committee established.

There is hereby established a joint committee of the senate and house of representatives officially known as the capital development committee. The committee functions during the legislative sessions and during the interim between sessions. The committee consists of six members selected as follows:

Three members from the senate, two appointed by the president of the senate and one appointed by the minority leader of the senate; and

Three members from the house of representatives, two appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and one appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives.

(1.5) In order to expedite the work of the capital development committee, appointees may be designated after the general election prior to the convening of the general assembly at which such committee is to serve, whether such appointees are members of the current general assembly or members-elect of the next general assembly, or both. Such appointees have all the powers and duties and are entitled to the same compensation and expense allowance as members duly appointed under the provisions of subsection (1) of this section.

The capital development committee shall elect a chair and a vice-chair at the first meeting held on or after October 15 in each odd-numbered year and at the first December meeting held after the general election in each even-numbered year. The chair and vice-chair appointments must alternate between a member from the house of representatives and a member from the senate with the first chair being from the senate and the first vice-chair being from the house of representatives. The person serving as chair, or a member of the same house if such person is no longer a member thereof, shall serve as vice-chair during the next legislative session, and the person serving as vice-chair, or a member of the same house if such person is no longer a member thereof, shall serve as chair during the next legislative session.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire part added, p. 283, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 841, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2007:

(1.5) amended, p. 924, § 1, effective August 3.

L. 2019:

(1) and (2) amended, (HB 19-1020), ch. 28, p. 90, § 1, effective August 2.

2-3-1303. Rules of procedure.

The capital development committee may prescribe its own rules of procedure and may appoint an advisory committee from among professionals in the private sector to include but not be limited by the following areas of expertise: Real estate, architecture, finance, and engineering.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire part added, p. 284, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 408, § 3, effective March 26.

L. 89:

(2)(a) amended, p. 336, § 2, effective March 15.

L. 90:

(2) repealed, p. 334, § 24, effective April 3.

2-3-1304. Powers and duties of capital development committee - definition.

The capital development committee has the following powers and duties:

To study capital construction, controlled maintenance, and capital renewal requests and proposals, pursuant to rule 45 of the joint rules of the senate and the house of representatives, of each state agency and state institution of higher education;

To review and make required recommendations on reports from state agencies and state institutions of higher education, including reports from:

The office of the state architect on the approved and unapproved facility management plans and facility management plan updates pursuant to section

24-30-1303.5

(3.5), C.R.S., and acquisitions and dispositions pursuant to sections

24-30-1303.5

(6) and

24-82-102

, C.R.S.;

The adjutant general in the department of military and veterans affairs on the acquisition or disposition of property pursuant to section 28-3-106 (1)(s)(I), C.R.S.;

The parks and wildlife commission in the department of natural resources on the acquisition or disposition of certain real property interests under section

33-1-105 (1)(i)

or (3), C.R.S., and the acquisition of certain interest in real property or water pursuant to section

33-1-105.5 (9)

, C.R.S.; and

The parks and wildlife commission in the department of natural resources on the acquisition or disposition of certain interests in real property pursuant to section

33-10-107 (2)

, C.R.S.;

To study the request from the transportation commission for state highway reconstruction, repair, and maintenance projects to be funded from money transferred to the capital construction fund pursuant to section

24-75-302 (2)

, C.R.S., specifically for such purpose. On or before October 1 of each year, the transportation commission shall submit its request, based on the statewide transportation improvement programs, with a prioritized list of recommended state highway reconstruction, repair, and maintenance projects with the priority of projects on the list determined on the basis of greatest need without regard to location in the state. The capital development committee shall determine the number of projects on the list that may be funded from money available in the capital construction fund for state highway reconstruction, repair, or maintenance projects. Only projects on the list may be funded from money available in the capital construction fund for state highway reconstruction, repair, or maintenance projects, and the projects must be funded in the priority determined by the transportation commission; except that, if a project on the list cannot be funded because an alternative source of funding for the project has become available, a court order has enjoined the project, or an act of God has made the project construction unfeasible, the transportation commission shall submit the next phase of that project or the next project on that regional priority list to the capital development committee for approval as an addition to the list in lieu of the project that cannot be funded. No substitute project submitted by the transportation commission from the regional priority list shall be approved by the capital development committee if funding said project would result in the delay of any other project on the list. Upon approval of an amended list, the department of transportation shall provide a copy of the amended list to the members of the joint budget committee, the transportation and energy committee in the house of representatives, and the transportation committee in the senate. Projects on the list submitted by the transportation commission by October 1 or on an amended list submitted as provided in this paragraph (a.5) may be funded from money transferred to the capital construction fund and available in the current fiscal year or money to be transferred to the capital construction fund for the fiscal year beginning the following July 1.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 1064, 8, effective July 1, 2008.)

To hold such hearings as may be necessary to consider reports from each state agency or state institution of higher education with respect to capital construction, controlled maintenance, or capital renewal;

To make determinations, pursuant to rule 45 of the joint rules of the senate and the house of representatives, of the priority to be accorded to the proposals made by the various state agencies and state institutions of higher education with respect to capital construction, controlled maintenance, and capital renewal proposals, based upon information made available to the capital development committee from any sources with respect to estimates of revenues available for such purposes;

To forecast the state's requirements for capital construction, controlled maintenance, and capital renewal as may be necessary or desirable for adequate presentation of the planning and implementation or construction of such projects and to forecast the projected available revenue to meet the state's requirements for capital construction, controlled maintenance, and capital renewal. Such revenue forecast must conform with the economic forecast period used in the quarterly revenue estimates prepared by the staff of the legislative council.

Repealed.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(f) is effective until July 1, 2023.] To review the annual capital construction and maintenance requests from the chief information officer of the office of information technology regarding the public safety communications trust fund created pursuant to section

24-37.5-506

, C.R.S.;

(f)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(f) is effective July 1, 2023.

]

To review the annual capital construction and maintenance requests from the chief information officer of the office of information technology regarding the public safety communications trust fund created pursuant to section

24-33.5-2510

;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2014.) / Repealed.

To review all acquisitions of real property by a state agency or state institution of higher education; except that, for any state agency or state institution of higher education that has statutory authority as of June 6, 2014, to acquire real property and such statutory authority specifies a process whereby the capital development committee either reviews, reviews and approves, or approves such an acquisition, then such statutory authority controls. If a state agency or state institution of higher education has statutory authority as of June 6, 2014, to acquire real property and such statutory authority does not include a process whereby the capital development committee either reviews, reviews and approves, or approves such acquisition, then this paragraph (h) controls. Section

23-1-106

, C.R.S., and any budget instructions of the office of state planning and budgeting that specify thresholds regarding the submission of acquisitions of real property as capital budget requests operate to limit the review specified in this paragraph (h).

Nothing in this section shall in any way limit or reduce the powers of the governor, through the office of state planning and budgeting and the office of the state architect, to establish executive branch priorities and procedures.

Not later than October 15, 2019, each state agency and state institution of higher education shall submit to the capital development committee a list of all nondeveloped real property owned by or under the control of the agency or institution. Not later than October 15 of each year thereafter, each agency or institution shall submit to the capital development committee any additions or deletions to the list identifying any nondeveloped real property the agency has acquired or disposed of during the preceding state fiscal year. The capital development committee shall include this information in an annual report published on the website of the general assembly. The division of housing within the department of local affairs shall provide a link to the report on the division's website. The division of parks and wildlife in the department of natural resources is exempt from the requirements of this subsection (3).

For purposes of this subsection (3), "nondeveloped real property" means unimproved real property that is not otherwise protected for or dedicated to another use such as an access or a conservation easement.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire part added, p. 284, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 94:

(1)(e) added, p. 1095, § 4, effective May 9; (1)(e) amended, p. 2614, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(1)(a.5) added, p. 1295, § 2, effective June 5; (1)(e) amended, p. 1275, § 11, effective June 5.

L. 96:

(1)(a.5) amended, p. 1869, § 2, effective June 6.

L. 98:

(1)(a.5) amended, p. 904, § 2, effective May 26; (1)(f) added, p. 939, § 6, effective May 27.

L. 2000:

(1)(a.6) added and (1)(b) amended, p. 502, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(1)(a.5) amended, p. 225, § 1, effective March 28; (1)(e) amended, p. 309, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2003:

(1)(a.5) amended, p. 2005, § 78, effective May 22.

L. 2007:

(1)(a) amended and (1)(a.3) added, p. 474, § 1, effective August 3; (1)(d) amended, p. 716, § 1, effective August 3.

L. 2008:

(1)(f) amended, p. 1129, § 10, effective May 22; (1)(a.6) and (1)(b) amended, p. 1064, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1)(g) added, (SB 09-228), ch. 410, p. 2254, § 1, effective July 1; (1)(f) amended, (SB 09-292), ch. 369, p. 1939, § 3, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(1)(e) amended, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 776, § 3, effective April 29.

L. 2012:

IP(1), IP(1)(a.3), (1)(a.3)(III), and (1)(a.3)(IV) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1202, § 3, effective June 4.

L. 2014:

(1), (1)(a), and (1)(c) amended, (HB 14-1387), ch. 378, pp. 1819, 1854, §§ 14, 69, effective June 6; (1)(a.3)(III) amended, (HB 14-1275), ch. 288, p. 1181, § 2, effective August 6; (1)(g) repealed, (SB 14-110), ch. 105, p. 390, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2015:

(1)(a.3)(I) and (2) amended and (1)(e) repealed, (SB 15-270), ch. 296, p. 1214, § 10, effective June 5.

L. 2019:

(3) added, (HB 19-1319), ch. 200, p. 2164, § 2, effective September 1.

L. 2022:

(1)(f) amended, (HB 22-1353), ch. 479, p. 3497, § 5, effective July 1, 2023.

2-3-1304.3. Additional powers and duties of capital development committee - approval and oversight of fund-raising for restoration of the capitol dome - legislative declaration - capitol dome restoration trust fund - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1402), ch. 255, p. 1133, § 1, effective May 25.

L. 2011:

(3), (6)(a)(II), and (7) amended, (HB 11-1310), ch. 225, p. 967, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

Subsection (7) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2015. (See L. 2011, p. 968.)

Cross references:

For additional capitol dome funding sources, see § 44-30-1201.

2-3-1304.5. Reports from departments, institutions, and agencies in connection with capital construction requests - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 89:

Entire section added, p. 335, § 1, effective April 27.

L. 2010:

Entire section RC&RE, (SB 10-192), ch. 254, p. 1131, § 2, effective August 11.

L. 2011:

(2) amended, (HB 11-1310), ch. 225, p. 970, § 3, effective August 10.

L. 2014:

(2) amended, (HB 14-1387), ch. 378, p. 1821, § 15, effective June 6.

2-3-1304.6. Capital construction and long-range planning by state agencies and state institutions of higher education - policy.

It is declared to be the policy of the general assembly not to acquire a capital asset or authorize or initiate any program or activity requiring capital construction, except programs or activities for controlled maintenance or capital renewal, for any state agency or state institution of higher education unless the program or activity is an element of the facilities program plan for the agency or institution and such facilities program plan has been approved by the state architect as set forth in section 24-30-1311, C.R.S., or by the Colorado commission on higher education as set forth in section 23-1-106, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 561, § 1, effective April 6.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (HB 14-1387), ch. 378, p. 1821, § 16, effective June 6.

L. 2015:

Entire section amended, (SB 15-270), ch. 296, p. 1215, § 11, effective June 5.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1387, see section 1 of chapter 378, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

2-3-1305. Recommendations and findings.

The capital development committee shall make written reports setting forth its recommendations, prioritization, findings, and comments as to each recommendation concerning capital assets that it submits to the joint budget committee. The capital development committee shall submit its prioritization for supplemental capital construction, capital renewal, or controlled maintenance budget requests pursuant to rule 45 of the joint rules of the senate and the house of representatives to the joint budget committee no later than January 15 of each year, and shall submit its prioritization for new or amended capital construction, capital renewal, or controlled maintenance budget requests pursuant to rule 45 of the joint rules of the senate and the house of representatives for the upcoming fiscal year to the joint budget committee no later than February 15 of each year. Other reports may be issued from time to time by the committee whenever it deems such action to be appropriate or whenever requested by the general assembly.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire part added, p. 284, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (HB 14-1387), ch. 378, pp. 1822, 1854, §§ 17, 70, effective June 6.

Cross references:

(1) For provisions concerning the deadline for recommendations concerning additional correctional facilities and the legislative implementation of such recommendations, see section 1 of chapter 33 and section 2 of chapter 120, Session Laws of Colorado 1990.

(2) For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1387, see section 1 of chapter 378, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

2-3-1305.5. Continuation projects - future appropriations. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 1885, § 3, effective June 1.

L. 2014:

Entire section repealed, (HB 14-1387), ch. 378, p. 1822, § 18, effective June 6.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1387, see section 1 of chapter 378, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

2-3-1306. Staff assistance.

In carrying out its duties under this part 13, the capital development committee may request staff assistance from the offices providing other legislative services or from the department of personnel and the office of state planning and budgeting in the governor's office. The legislative council shall provide any necessary assistance.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire part added, p. 284, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 634, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (HB 14-1387), ch. 378, p. 1822, § 19, effective June 6.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1387, see section 1 of chapter 378, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

2-3-1307. Highway and bridge projects - exempt.

This part 13 shall not apply to projects or properties which are funded or disposed of pursuant to the provisions of sections 43-1-106, 43-1-219, or 43-1-220, C.R.S., but shall apply to projects funded from the capital construction fund in accordance with section 2-3-1304 (1)(a.5).

Source:

L. 85:

Entire part added, p. 285, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1056, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 1297, § 6, effective June 5.

2-3-1308. Repeal of part. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 85:

Entire part added, p. 285, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 336, § 1, effective March 15.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 628, § 1, effective April 14.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1791, § 1, effective June 4.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 231, § 2, effective March 31.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (HB 09-1169), ch. 45, p. 168, § 1, effective March 20.

L. 2014:

Entire section repealed, (HB 14-1387), ch. 378, p. 1822, § 20, effective June 6.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1387, see section 1 of chapter 378, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.